Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1014
Rules and regulations.

If the right-of-way or portion thereof is used as a state recreational trail or for other purposes as provided in sections 37-912 and 37-1011, the Game and Parks Commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of sections 37-912 and 37-1010 to 37-1013.

Laws 1993, LB 739, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.63;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 389;

Laws 2000, LB 701, § 5.